Maryland, session 2025, SB0308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
10–201.
(a) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, each
local board shall provide at least four election judges to be the staff for each polling place.
(ii) In a precinct with fewer than 200 registered voters, the local
board may provide two election judges for that precinct’s polling place.
(2) An election judge shall be appointed in accordance with the
requirements of § 10–203 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this
subsection, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, each polling place shall have an equal
number of election judges, INCLUDING CHIEF JUDGES DESIGNATED UNDER § 10–203
OF THIS SUBTITLE, from:
– 1 –

Ch. 276 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) the majority party; and
(ii) the principal minority party.
(2) [(i)] If the total number of election judges for a precinct is six or more:
[1.] (I) a local board may provide one or more election
judges who are not registered with either the majority party or principal minority political
party; and
[2.] (II) a local board may provide one or more election
judges who are minors.
[(ii) The number of election judges provided under this paragraph
may not exceed the lesser of:
1. the number of election judges who belong to the majority
party; or
2. the number of election judges who belong to the principal
minority party.]
(3) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES IF AN ELECTION DIRECTOR IS
UNABLE TO DESIGNATE CHIEF JUDGES FOR A POLLING PLACE AT LEAST 45 DAYS
BEFORE THE START OF EARLY VOTING.
(II) IF AN ELECTION DIRECTOR DESIGNATING TWO CHIEF
JUDGES FOR A POLLING PLACE UNDER § 10–203 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS UNABLE TO
DESIGNATE THE CHIEF JUDGES IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN ELECTION DIRECTOR SHALL DESIGNATE:
1. ONE CHIEF JUDGE FROM THE MAJORITY PARTY OR
THE PRINCIPAL MINORITY POLITICAL PARTY; AND
2. ONE CHIEF JUDGE WHO IS NOT REGISTERED WITH
EITHER THE MAJORITY PARTY OR THE PRINCIPAL MINORITY POLITICAL PARTY.
10–203.
(a) The election director, with the approval of the local board, shall appoint the
election judges for each polling place for a term that begins on the Tuesday that is 13 weeks
before each statewide primary election.
(b) One or two election judges in each precinct shall:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 276
(1) be designated chief judge; and
(2) supervise the staff at the polling place.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –